test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-minemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - minemä: # Verb (78) `saama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     minemä+V+Inf/mA: minemä
     minemä+V+Inf: minnäq
     minemä+V+ActPrtPrc: lännüq
     minemä+V+PssPrtPrc: [mint, mintü]

     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: lää
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [läät, läädeq]
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: lätt
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: läämiq
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: läätiq
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: [lääväq, lätväq]
     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: lää
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: lätsi
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [lätsit, lätsiq, lätsideq]
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: lätsʼ
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: lätsimiq
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [lätsitiq, lätsideq]
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [lätsiq, lätsiväq]
     minemä+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: lää

     minemä+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: mindäs

     minemä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: minnev

     minemä+V+Jus: minkuq
